Utah statutes.
63C-13-106.   No effect on local land use authority.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit or otherwise affect a municipality's authority under Title 10, Chapter 9a, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act, with respect to the private development of the land on which the state prison is presently located.

